Hawaii statutes.
[§398A-4] Restoration of employment.
An employer, upon expiration of a leave authorized by this chapter, shall
restore an employee to the position held by the employee when the leave began
or to a position with equivalent seniority status, employee benefits, pay, and
other terms and conditions of employment. An employer may decline to restore
an employee as required in this section because of conditions unrelated to the
employee's exercise of rights under this chapter. [L 2014, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next